Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 8
Transition Provisions for 2011 Amendments

§ 28-9-801. [Reserved.]

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-801, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-802. Savings clause.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, this act applies to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before this act takes effect.

This act does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before this act takes effect.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-802, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-803. Security interest perfected before effective date.

A security interest that is a perfected security interest immediately before this act takes effect is a perfected security interest under this chapter as amended by this act if, when this act takes effect, the applicable requirements for attachment and perfection under this chapter as amended by this act are satisfied without further action.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-805, Idaho Code, if, immediately before this act takes effect, a security interest is a perfected security interest, but the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter as amended by this act are not satisfied when this act takes effect, the security interest remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter as amended by this act are satisfied within one (1) year after this act takes effect.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-803, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-804. Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is an unperfected security interest immediately before this act takes effect becomes a perfected security interest:

Without further action, when this act takes effect if the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter as amended by this act are satisfied before or at that time; or

When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-804, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-805. Effectiveness of action taken before effective date.

The filing of a financing statement before this act takes effect is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter as amended by this act.

This act does not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before this act takes effect, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this chapter as it existed before amendment. However, except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and section 28-9-806, Idaho Code, the financing statement ceases to be effective:

If the financing statement is filed in this state, at the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective had this act not taken effect; or

If the financing statement is filed in another jurisdiction, at the earlier of:

the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of that jurisdiction; or

June 30, 2018.

The filing of a continuation statement after this act takes effect does not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before this act takes effect. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement after this act takes effect and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this chapter as amended by this act, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before this act takes effect continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

Subsection (b)(2)(B) of this section applies to a financing statement that, before this act takes effect, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this chapter as it existed before amendment, only to the extent that this chapter as amended by this act provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before this act takes effect and a continuation statement filed after this act takes effect is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of part 5 of this chapter as amended by this act for an initial financing statement. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a decedent’s estate indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative within the meaning of section 28-9-503(a)(2), Idaho Code, as amended by this act. A financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a trust or is a trustee acting with respect to property held in trust indicates that the collateral is held in a trust within the meaning of section 28-9-503(a)(3), Idaho Code, as amended by this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-805, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-806. When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in section 28-9-501, Idaho Code, continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before this act takes effect if:

The filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this chapter as amended by this act;

The pre-effective-date financing statement was filed in an office in another state; and

The initial financing statement satisfies subsection (c) of this section.

The filing of an initial financing statement under subsection (a) of this section continues the effectiveness of the pre-effective-date financing statement:

If the initial financing statement is filed before this act takes effect, for the period provided in unamended section 28-9-515, Idaho Code, with respect to an initial financing statement; and

If the initial financing statement is filed after this act takes effect, for the period provided in section 28-9-515, Idaho Code, as amended by this act with respect to an initial financing statement.

To be effective for purposes of subsection (a) of this section, an initial financing statement must:

Satisfy the requirements of part 5 of this chapter as amended by this act for an initial financing statement;

Identify the pre-effective-date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

Indicate that the pre-effective-date financing statement remains effective.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-806, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-807. Amendment of pre-effective-date financing statement.

In this section, “pre-effective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before this act takes effect.

After this act takes effect, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in a pre-effective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this chapter as amended by this act. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended after this act takes effect only if:

The pre-effective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in section 28-9-501, Idaho Code;

An amendment is filed in the office specified in section 28-9-501, Idaho Code, concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies section 28-9-806(c), Idaho Code; or

An initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies section 28-9-806(c), Idaho Code, is filed in the office specified in section 28-9-501, Idaho Code.

If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement may be continued only under section 28-9-805(c) and (e) or 28-9-806, Idaho Code.

Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated after this act takes effect by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies section 28-9-806(c), Idaho Code, has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in this chapter as amended by this act as the office in which to file a financing statement.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-807, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-808. Person entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

The secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

The filing is necessary under this part:

to continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before this act takes effect; or

to perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-808, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.

§ 28-9-809. Priority.

This act determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before this act takes effect, this chapter as it existed before amendment determines priority.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-809, as added by 2012, ch. 145, § 20, p. 381.